North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 9A. Nature Preserves Act. [Repealed]

§ 113A-164.1.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.250 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.2.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.252 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.3.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.254 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.4.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.256 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.5.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.258 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.6.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.260 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.7.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.262 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.8.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.264 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.9.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.266 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.10.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.268 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.11.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.270 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-164.12.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.272 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k2), effective July 1, 2015.